Connecticut, session 2026, SB00441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to study the potential for members of a limited liability company or
other business entity to circumvent the provisions of chapter 557 or 558
of the general statutes by establishing other business entities.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 441
(7) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(8) The Secretary of the State, or the secretary's designee;
(9) The Commissioner of Revenue Services, or the commissioner's
designee; and
(10) The Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
commissioner's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and
public employees shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor
and public employees, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 441
Section 1 from passage New section
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3